Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF39.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1880XS (3) 91 th/ns S.F. 39 Section 1. Section 327G.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 327G.2 Crossings ââ signs , gate arms, and signals . 3 1. Every Notwithstanding the requirements under section 4 327G.15, every railroad corporation constructing or operating 5 a railway shall make and construct at all points where such 6 railway crosses any public road good, sufficient, and safe 7 crossings , and erect at such points, at a sufficient elevation 8 from such road as to admit a free passage of vehicles of every 9 kind, a sign at least two signs with large and distinct letters 10 placed thereon , and install a sufficient number of gate arms, 11 gate arm signals, and crossing signal lights designed to flash 12 when a train approaches a crossing, to give notice of the 13 proximity of the railway , and warn persons of the necessity 14 of looking out for trains. The railroad corporation is 15 responsible for all costs associated with complying with this 16 subsection. 17 2. Any railway company railroad corporation neglecting or 18 refusing to comply with the provisions of this section shall be 19 liable for all damages sustained by reason of such refusal or 20 neglect, and it shall only be necessary, in order to recover, 21 for the injured party to prove such neglect or refusal. 22